Illinois, session 104th, HB5120.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Regulatory Sunset Act is amended by 5changing Sections 4.37 and 4.42 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 80/4.37)7    Sec. 4.37. Acts and Articles repealed on January 1, 2027. 8The following are repealed on January 1, 2027:9    The Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act.10    The Illinois Optometric Practice Act of 1987.11    Articles II, III, IV, V, VI, VIIA, VIIC, XVII, XXXI, and 12XXXI 1/4 of the Illinois Insurance Code. 13    The Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation Act.14    The Marriage and Family Therapy Licensing Act. 15    The Boxing and Full-contact Martial Arts Act.16    The Cemetery Oversight Act.17    The Community Association Manager Licensing and 18Disciplinary Act.19    The Detection of Deception Examiners Act.20    The Home Inspector License Act.21    The Massage Licensing Act.22    The Medical Practice Act of 1987.23    The Petroleum Equipment Contractors Licensing Act.  HB5120- 2 -LRB104 19945 TRT 33395 b1    The Radiation Protection Act of 1990.2    The Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 2002.3    The Registered Interior Designers Act.4    The Landscape Architecture Registration Act.5    The Water Well and Pump Installation Contractor's License 6Act.7    The Licensed Certified Professional Midwife Practice Act.8(Source: P.A. 102-20, eff. 6-25-21; 102-284, eff. 8-6-21; 9102-437, eff. 8-20-21; 102-656, eff. 8-27-21; 102-683, eff. 1010-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-371, eff. 1-1-24; 103-823, 11eff. 8-9-24.) 12    (5 ILCS 80/4.42)13    Sec. 4.42. Acts repealed on January 1, 2032. The following 14Acts are repealed on January 1, 2032:15    The Collateral Recovery Act.16    The Boiler and Pressure Vessel Repairer Regulation Act. 17    The Petroleum Equipment Contractors Licensing Act. 18(Source: P.A. 103-371, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.